Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.23
Administrator; personnel.

The administrator may employ architects, drafters, specialized engineers, and other professional personnel to provide plans, working drawings, and specifications required for the adequate maintenance, improvement, construction, and reconstruction of the state laboratory and grounds, Governor's Mansion and grounds, and all other buildings and lands owned or leased by the State of Nebraska and under the administrator's control and may employ secretarial and administrative personnel necessary to carry out this section.

Laws 1955, c. 329, § 2, p. 1027;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-709.02;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 14;

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 23.